Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.380

Appropriations by legislature.

(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.

(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.

[ 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3. Prior: 2009 c 548 s 110; 2009 c 479 s 16; 2001 c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 728, approved November 7, 2000); 1995 c 335 s 103; 1990 c 33 s 115; 1980 c 6 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.050; prior: 1945 c 141 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4940-2. Formerly RCW 28A.41.050, 28.41.050.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—2012 1st sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 84.52.0531.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Short title—Purpose—Intent—Construction—Effective dates—2001 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 728): See notes following RCW 67.70.240.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Severability—1980 c 6: See note following RCW 28A.515.320.